Louisiana, session 2026, HB1001.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The United States Highway 190 between River Road and Interstate 110,
in the city of Baton Rouge, parish of East Baton Rouge, shall be known and is hereby
redesignated as the "Jesse Jackson Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1